Utah statutes.
53B-6-105.   Engineering and Computer Technology Initiative.
(1)  The Legislature recognizes that a significant increase in the number of
engineering, computer science, and related technology graduates from the state
system of higher education is required over the next several years to advance
the intellectual, cultural, social, and economic well-being of the state and
its citizens.
(2) (a) (i)  The State Board of Regents shall therefore develop, establish,
and maintain an Engineering and Computer Science Initiative within the state
system of higher education to double the number of graduates in engineering,
computer science, and related technology by 2006 and triple the number of
graduates by 2009.
(ii)  The board shall make a rule in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, providing the criteria for those fields of
study that qualify as "related technology" under this section and Sections
53B-6-105.7 and 53B-6-105.9.
(b)  The initiative shall include components that:
(i)  improve the quality of instructional programs in engineering, computer
science, and related technology by providing supplemental money for equipment
purchases; and
(ii)  provide incentives to:
(A)  students through a scholarship program under Section 53B-6-105.7; and
(B)  institutions to hire and retain faculty under Section 53B-6-105.9.
(3)  The increase in program capacity under Subsection (2)(a) shall include
funding for new and renovated capital facilities and funding for new
engineering and computer science programs.
(4)  The Legislature shall provide an annual appropriation to the State Board
of Regents to fund the initiative.
